District of Columbia statutes.
2-1552

Children and Youth Initiative established.

There is established a Children and Youth Initiative (“Initiative”) to provide out-of-school programs for District of Columbia children and youth.

History

Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 2402, 46 DCR 6408